apertium-kas.kas.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>AaÂâEeIiOoÔôUuÚúÁáYyWwHhLlRrMmNnVvSsZzŞşÇçBbPpTtDdŦŧĐđCcJjKkGgXxQqFfь</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
    <sdef n="vblex"           c="Verb, lexical"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"           c="'To be' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"         c="'To have' verb"/>
    <sdef n="p1"              c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"              c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"              c="3rd person"/>
    <sdef n="f"               c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"               c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="un"              c="No gender"/>
    <sdef n="sg"              c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"              c="Plural"/>
    <!-- TAM -->
    <sdef n="con"             c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="inf"             c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="fut"             c="Future"/>
    <sdef n="pres"            c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="past"            c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="n"               c="Noun"/>

    <sdef n="nom"             c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="erg" c="Ergative" />
    <sdef n="dat" c="Dative" />
    <sdef n="abl" c="Ablative" />

    <sdef n="acc"             c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"             c="Genitive"/>

    <sdef n="prox" c="Proximate"/>
    <sdef n="indf" c="Indefinite"/>


    <sdef n="pp"              c="Perfective participle"/>
    <sdef n="impf"            c="Imperfective participle"/>
    <sdef n="conj"            c="Conjunctive participle"/>


    <sdef n="np"              c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"           c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"            c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"          c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"          c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"          c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pr"              c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"             c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="ij"              c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adj"             c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="prn"             c="Pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="attr"            c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="top"             c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"             c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"             c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="org"             c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="al"              c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/>

    <sdef n="pers"            c="Personal pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ref"             c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="res"             c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="det"             c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pos"             c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="nt"              c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="ut"              c="Utrum"/>


    <sdef n="sp"              c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="du"              c="Dual"/>

    <sdef n="ind"             c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"             c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="dem"             c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"             c="Question word / interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"             c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="neg"             c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="emph"            c="Emphatic"/>

    <sdef n="imp"             c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pret"            c="Preterite"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"            c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="actv"            c="Active voice"/>

    <sdef n="sint"            c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
    <sdef n="pst"             c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"            c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"             c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="ord"             c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="acr"             c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="unc"             c="Uncountable"/>

    <sdef n="num"             c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent"            c="Sentence end"/>
    <sdef n="cm"              c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"            c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"            c="Dash"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"            c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"            c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"           c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"           c="Right quote"/>

    <sdef n="compound-only-L" c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-R"      c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Nouns -->

    <!-- kul -->
    <pardef n="kul__n">
        <e><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ь</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ь</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>is</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yan</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- muol -->
    <pardef n="m/uol__n">
        <e><p><l>uol</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aelь</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aelь</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aalyav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aelis</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aalyan</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- hoŧ -->
    <pardef n="h/oŧ__n">
        <e><p><l>oŧ</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>áŧь</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>áŧь</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aŧyav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>áŧis</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aŧyan</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>áŧi</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aŧyav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- bar -->
    <pardef n="bar__n">
        <e><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>an</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>av</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>as</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>an</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ú</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>av</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- gagur -->
    <pardef n="gag/ur__n">
        <e><p><l>ur</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ar</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ran</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ras</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ran</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rú</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kul"><i>kul</i><par n="kul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gur"><i>gur</i><par n="kul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="şur"><i>şur</i><par n="kul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="goor"><i>goor</i><par n="kul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hoon"><i>hoon</i><par n="kul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="m"><i>m</i><par n="m/uol__n"/></e>
    <e lm=" "><i></i><par n="m/uol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="h"><i>h</i><par n="h/oŧ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="l"><i>l</i><par n="h/oŧ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuol"><i>k</i><par n="m/uol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bar"><i>bar</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaal"><i>vaal</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bar"><i>bar</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baag"><i>baag</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aes"><i>aes</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nab"><i>nab</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dwad"><i>dwad</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aab"><i>aab</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaaş"><i>gaaş</i><par n="bar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gag"><i>gag</i><par n="gag/ur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kwak"><i>kwak</i><par n="gag/ur__n"/></e>
